Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 1 General Provisions
32-2-7.
Compensation for employees injured in line of duty.

As used in this Code section, the term “external violence, accident, or injury” means any act of violence, an accident, or an injury that is caused by a person other than:

One who is an employee of the department; or

One who is an employee of a contractor or subcontractor performing duties under a contract with the department.

Any employee of the department who, on or after July 1, 1987, is injured in the line of duty by an act of external violence, accident, or injury shall be entitled to receive compensation as provided in this Code section. Going to and from work shall not be considered in the line of duty. For the purposes of this Code section, “line of duty” means working in the proximity of traffic movements or equipment movements doing maintenance, construction, or other activities which may be construed as hazardous.

An employee injured in the line of duty as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section shall continue to receive his regular compensation for the period of time that the employee is physically unable to perform the duties of his employment; provided, however, that such benefits provided in this Code section shall not be granted for injuries resulting from a single incident for more than a total of 180 working days. An employee shall be required to submit to his department head satisfactory evidence of such disability.

Benefits made available under this Code section shall be subordinate to any workers’ compensation benefits for which the employee is eligible and shall be limited to the difference between the amount of available workers’ compensation benefits and the amount of the employee’s regular compensation.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 390, § 1.

32-2-8.
Department to fly POW-MIA flag at interstate rest areas.

The Department of Transportation shall fly the POW-MIA flag year-round at each of the rest areas along interstate highways in this state. The department is authorized to place a plaque at each rest area to indicate Georgia’s appreciation of the sacrifices of prisoners of war and those missing in action and their families.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 485, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, “year-round” was substituted for “year round” in the first sentence.